Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 5

Voting by Military and Overseas Citizens

2-6-501. Voting or registering by mail outside United States or by armed forces — Envelopes.

For persons voting absentee by mail or registering by mail from outside the territorial limits of the United States and for all armed forces personnel, there shall be printed across the face of each envelope in which a ballot or any registration material is to be sent the words “Official Election Balloting Material-Via Air Mail”, or similar language. Furthermore, there shall be printed the words “Free of United States Postage, Including Air Mail.”

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 2-606, 2-6-106; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 6; 2008, ch. 928, § 13; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

2-6-502. Armed forces personnel — Persons temporarily outside United States — Procedure.

Any application to vote absentee by mail from armed forces personnel anywhere outside the county where the voter is registered or from qualified voters temporarily staying outside the territorial limits of the United States and the District of Columbia shall be processed under this section if it does not meet the requirements of § 2-6-202 as an absentee voting application or if the applicant is not a registered voter. A certificate of nonregistration is not required of a person voting under this section.

An application for an absentee ballot or temporary registration or both from any person authorized to vote absentee by mail under subsection (a) may be in any form but shall contain the applicant's name, social security number, date of birth, and residence in the county in which the applicant proposes to vote and shall contain the address to which the absentee ballot is to be mailed. If the election is a primary election, the applicant shall state such applicant's political party preference. The county election commission shall accept the federal postcard application or the application for the federal write-in absentee ballot, as provided for in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, Public Law 99-410, 42 U.S.C. § 1973ff et seq., for temporary registration and for an absentee ballot for all elections for which the person is eligible to vote. An application or ballot affidavit shall be signed by the voter, under the penalty of perjury, thereby verifying all the information on the application or ballot affidavit is true and correct and that the voter is eligible to vote in the election. The social security number, date of birth, mailing address and electronic mailing address contained on such application shall be confidential and not subject to the open records law compiled in title 10, chapter 7.

An application must be received in the county election commission office of the county in which the applicant is a resident not later than seven (7) days before the election and not earlier than January 1 of the year in which the election is to be held; provided, that in the event an election is to be held less than ninety (90) days after January 1 of any calendar year, applications under this section may be received not earlier than ninety (90) days before the election in which the applicant desires to vote.

An application for an absentee ballot under this section shall be treated as an application for temporary registration if the applicant is not already a registered voter where such applicant applies to vote. The applicant shall be granted temporary registration if such applicant is a qualified voter under § 2-2-102. Temporary registration under this section is not subject to the deadline set in § 2-2-109. A person applying to vote absentee under this section in a primary election may request in such person's application for an absentee ballot that an absentee ballot for the succeeding general election be sent to the person when such ballots become available for distribution; provided, that if a voter voting hereunder moves from the location where the voter is to be sent a primary ballot between the primary and general elections, such voter shall notify the county election commission of such move and advise the commission where the general election ballot is to be sent.

Upon determining whether the applicant is entitled to register, vote, or both in the election, the administrator of elections shall proceed under the general provisions of this chapter for voting absentee by mail or under procedures determined by the coordinator of elections for electronically transmitting voting materials. In all counties, the attesting official shall update the voter's computerized voter history by making the appropriate data entry.

Ballots received under this section shall be processed as other absentee ballots from persons voting absentee by mail. A federal write-in absentee ballot from any applicant under this section shall be counted for all elections for which the applicant is eligible to vote.

A United States citizen who was born abroad and who is eligible to vote and who has never lived in the United States may register temporarily and vote in the county where a parent would be eligible to temporarily register and vote pursuant to this section.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-612; Acts 1983, ch. 107, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 933, § 10; T.C.A., §2-6-112; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 6; 1997, ch. 558, § 14; 2007, ch. 125, § 4; 2010, ch. 636, §§ 2-4; 2011, ch. 176, §§ 2, 3.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, chapter 16, part 7.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N.L. Resener, J.A. Whitson, K.J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Collateral References.

Voting by persons in military service. 34 A.L.R.2d 1193.

2-6-503. Special write-in absentee ballots.

Not later than forty-five (45) days before a federal election, as defined in § 2-1-104, the administrator of elections shall mail a ballot or electronically transfer a ballot to each member of the armed forces and each citizen temporarily outside the United States who is entitled to vote and who has submitted a valid application for a ballot. The ballot shall be mailed or electronically transferred in accordance with the preferred method of transmission designated by the applicant. If no preferred method is specified, the ballot shall be mailed. Nothing herein shall be construed to permit the transfer of a ballot by use of a fax machine or to permit a ballot which has been voted by an applicant to be electronically received by the election commission. The coordinator of elections is authorized to develop rules and procedures to ensure full compliance with federal law. The mailed ballot or the electronically transferred ballot shall be in one of the following forms:

An official absentee ballot that complies with the requirements of chapter 5, part 2 of this title and this chapter; or

A write-in ballot that is substantially identical to an absentee ballot described in subdivision (a)(1), except that no candidates' names shall be listed anywhere on the ballot. In addition to this write-in ballot, the administrator of elections shall include a complete list of all candidates who have qualified for the offices listed on the write-in ballot.

Compliance with the time requirements of subsection (a) is required for any federal election as defined by § 2-1-104. For any other election, if the coordinator of elections determines the appropriate qualifying or filing deadline does not reasonably allow compliance, the administrator of elections shall mail or electronically transfer a ballot not later than thirty (30) days before the election.

If the coordinator of elections determines an undue hardship exists for any federal election which prevents a county from complying with the time requirements of subsection (a), the coordinator of elections shall request a waiver as permitted under federal law.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of representatives in congress, and the coordinator of elections determines an undue hardship exists and a timely waiver may not be granted, preventing an election commission from complying with the time requirements of subsection (a), the following shall apply:

Notwithstanding the time established in § 2-16-101 for calling for a special election, within ten (10) days of the vacancy occurring, the governor shall, by writs of election, order a special election to fill the vacancy. The governor shall first determine whether the special election may be held in conjunction with an upcoming regular primary or general election as provided in § 2-14-102;

If the special election cannot be held in such manner, the governor shall, by writ of election, set a date not less than seventy-five (75) nor more than eighty (80) days from the date of the writ for primary election for nominations by statewide political parties to fill the vacancy and shall, by the same writ of election, set a date of not less than one hundred thirty (130) nor more than one hundred thirty-five (135) days from the date of the writ for a general election to fill the vacancy. Candidates for the primary elections and independent candidates for the general election shall qualify as required in regular elections but shall file qualifying petitions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the eighth Tuesday before the day of the primary elections. A candidate's request to withdraw shall be filed no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the third day after the qualifying deadline;

Except where this section makes different provisions, chapter 14 of this title shall govern elections required by this section. The state primary boards shall perform their duties under chapter 8 of this title with respect to primaries held under this section as quickly as practicable and shall certify the nominees of their parties to the county election commissions no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the fiftieth day before the day of the general election.

Acts 1987, ch. 142, § 1; 1990, ch. 628, § 6; T.C.A., §2-6-130; Acts 1994, ch. 859, § 6; 2010, ch. 636, §§ 5-7.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Cross-References. Application for early and absentee voting, §2-6-308.

Collateral References.

Challenges to Write-in Ballots and Certification of Write-in Candidates. 75 A.L.R.6th 311.